Washington statutes.
RCW 23.95.605

Grounds.

The secretary of state may commence a proceeding under RCW 23.95.610 to dissolve a domestic entity administratively if:

(1) The entity does not pay any fee, interest, or penalty required to be paid to the secretary of state when due;

(2) The entity does not deliver an annual report to the secretary of state not later than one hundred twenty days after it is due;

(3) The entity does not have a registered agent in this state for thirty consecutive days; or

(4) The entity's period of duration stated in its public organic record expired.

[ 2015 c 176 s 1602.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.